Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.045

Contracts with certified public accountants.

The state auditor may contract with public accountants certified in Washington to carry out those portions of the duties of auditing state agencies and local governments as the state auditor may determine.

[ 1995 c 301 s 4.]